tr: Simli parçacık boyutu: Tıknaz; İnce; Orta; Mikro ince; Karışık; Süper iri parçalı; Ultra ince; Diğer
pt-BR: Tamanho de partícula do glitter: Grosso; Fino; Médio; Microparticulado; Mix; Super grosso; Ultrafino; Outro
vi: Kích thước hạt kim tuyến: Chunky; Mịn; Vừa; Siêu mịn; Hỗn hợp; Siêu to; Siêu cấp mịn; Khác
it: Taglia delle particelle di glitter: Gigante; Fine; Medio; Microfine; Misto; Super grossolano; Ultra fine; Altro
zh-TW: 亮片顆粒大小: 厚實紗; 細; 中等; 超細緻; 混合; 超大塊狀; 極細; 其他
sk-SK: Veľkosť trblietok: Chunky; Jemný; Stredný; Mikrojemné; Zmiešaný; Super hrubé; Ultra jemný; Iné
hr-HR: Veličina čestica sjaja: Debela; Tanka; Polusuho; Mikrofini; Miješani; Super krupan; Iznimno sitni; Ostalo
zh-CN: 闪粉颗粒大小: 单股粗线; 细; 中度; 超细; 混合; 超大块; 极细; 其他
cs: Velikost částic třpytek: Hustá; Jemný; Střední; Mikrojemné; Míchaná; Velmi hrubé; Ultra jemný; Jiné
lt-LT: Blizgučių dalelių dydis: Stori; Ploni; Vidutinis; Mikrosmulkus; Maišytas; Itin stambus; Ultrasmulkus; Kita
nl: Glitterdeeltjesgrootte: Grof; Fijn; Medium; Microfijn; Gemengd; Extra grof; Ultrafijn; Andere
pl: Rozmiar cząstek brokatu: Z kawałkami; Drobny; Średni; Mikrodrobny; Mieszane; Super gruby; Ultra drobny; Inne
ro-RO: Dimensiunea particulelor de sclipici: Voluminos; Subțire; Medie; Microfin; Amestecat; Super gros; Ultra fină; Altele
ru: Размер частиц блесток: Толстая; Тонкий; Средний; Микромелкий; Смешанный; Супер крупный; Ультрамелкий; Другой
el: Μέγεθος σωματιδίων γκλίτερ: Χοντρός; Λεπτές; Μέση; Μικρολεπτό; Ανάμεικτο; Υπερ-χοντρό; Εξαιρετικά λεπτό; Άλλο
nb: Glitterpartikkelstørrelse: Tykk; Fint; Middels; Mikrofin; Blandet; Supergrov; Ultrafint; Annet
fi: Kimalteiden hiukkaskoko: Paksu; Hieno; Keskimääräinen; Mikrohieno; Sekoitettu; Erittäin karkea; Ultrahieno; Muu
es: Tamaño de partícula de brillo: Grueso; Fino; Medio; Microfino; Mezcla; Super grueso; Ultrafino; Otros
en: Glitter particle size: Chunky; Fine; Medium; Microfine; Mixed; Super chunky; Ultra fine; Other
hu: Csillámrészecske mérete: Vaskos; Finom; Közepes; Mikrofinom; Vegyes; Extra nagy darabos; Ultra finom; Egyéb
da: Glitterpartikelstørrelse: Tykt; Fint; Medium; Mikrofin; Blandet; Super groft; Ultra fint; Andet
ko: 글리터 입자 크기: 청키; 고운; 중간; 마이크로파인; 혼합; 슈퍼 청키; 초미세; 기타
th: ขนาดอนุภาคกลิตเตอร์: ชังกี; ละเอียด; ปานกลาง; ไมโครละเอียด; ผสม; เม็ดใหญ่พิเศษ; ละเอียดสูงสุด; อื่นๆ
de: Glitter-Partikelgröße: Klobig; Fein; Mittel; Mikrofein; Gemischt; Super grob; Ultrafein; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Размер на блестящите частици: Чуплива; Фина; Средна; Микрофини; Смесен; Супер едри; Изключително фин; Други
sv: Glitterpartikelstorlek: Tjockt; Fint; Medium; Mikrofint; Blandad; Supergrovt; Ultrafin; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tamanho das partículas de glitter: Volumoso; Moagem fina; Moagem média; Microfino; Mistura; Super grosso; Ultrafino; Outro
fr: Taille des particules de paillettes: Chunky; Fin; Moyen; Microfin; Mixte; Super gros; Ultra fin; Autre
ja: グリッター粒子サイズ: チャンキー; 細挽き; 中挽き; マイクロファイン; ミックス; スーパーチャンキー; 極細; その他
sl-SI: Velikost delcev bleščic: Debela; Fino; Medij; Mikro fini; Mešan; Super grobi; Izjemno fina; Drugo